Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-550
Buildings; construction; regulation.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to prescribe and alter limits within which no buildings shall be constructed except of brick, stone, or other incombustible material, with fireproof roof. After such limits are established, no special permits shall be given for the erection of buildings of combustible material within such limits.

Laws 1879, § 69, XIX, p. 214;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XIX, p. 182;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XIX, p. 173;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XIX, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 5124;

C.S.1922, § 4299;

C.S.1929, § 17-448;

R.S.1943, § 17-550;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 175.

Injunction will issue against erection of buildings in violation of ordinance, if party shows that their erection will work special injury to him. Bangs v. Dworak, 75 Neb. 714, 106 N.W. 780 (1906).